District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1104.02

“Person” defined.

Repealed.

June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 4, 25 DCR 9454
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, §§ 3(s), 7, 29 DCR 458
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 307, 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 1-1442.
1973 Ed., § 1-1161.1.
Applicability of chapter to Law 11-144: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-144, the Contribution Limitation Initiative Amendment Act of 1996, provided that D.C. Code § 1-1101.01 et seq. shall apply to the act. D.C. Law 11-144 repeals § 1-1104.01 and amends §§ 1-1131.01, 1-1131.03, and 1-1104.02.